Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB248.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 6 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section unless the context otherwise requires:
(a) "Director" means the director of the Legislative Research Commission; and
(b) "Family impact statement" means a statement of the estimated effect on
Kentucky families in implementing or complying with any proposed act or
resolution of the General Assembly whether filed in regular session or
extraordinary session.
(2) A family impact statement shall:
(a) Be in writing;
(b) Be signed by the director or the director's designee; and
(c) Determine the extent to which the proposed act of the General Assembly
will:
1. Raise or lower the cost of housing for a family;
2. Increase or reduce the likely marriage rate and the likelihood of
couples staying married;
3. Increase or reduce the out of wedlock birth rate;
4. Increase or reduce the cost of raising and educating a child;
5. Increase or decrease a parent's control over their children's
education;
6. Increase or decrease the likelihood of children completing education
to the point of being job ready;
7. Assist or hinder foster and adoption efforts; and
8. Help or hinder the efforts to care for extended family members at
home or outside of the home.
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 12/17/2024 12:36 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 474
(3) The director shall have the family impact statement prepared by the Legislative
Research Commission or by other departments or agencies of state government
for any bill, concurrent resolution, joint resolution, amendment, or committee
substitute introduced before the General Assembly. Departments or agencies of
state government so requested by the director shall comply with the request within
seven (7) working days of receipt. The family impact statement shall be filed with
the clerk in the chamber of the General Assembly in which the bill, concurrent
resolution, joint resolution, amendment, or committee substitute was introduced
and attached to each copy of the bill.
(4) No bill, concurrent resolution, or joint resolution shall be voted on by either
chamber of the General Assembly unless a family impact statement has been
prepared pursuant to this section and attached to the bill or resolution.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 12/17/2024 12:36 PM Jacketed